Utah, session 2026, HB12.
Section 1. Section 79-8-102 is amended to read:79-8-102. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Accessible to the general public" in relation to the awarding of an infrastructure grant, means:(a)the public may use the infrastructure in accordance with federal and state regulations; and(b)no community or group retains exclusive rights to access the infrastructure.(2)"Advisory committee" means the Utah Outdoor Recreation Infrastructure Advisory Committee created in Section 79-7-206.(3)"Children," in relation to the awarding of a UCORE grant, means individuals who are six years old or older and 18 years old or younger.(4)"Director" means the director of the Division of Outdoor Recreation.(5)"Division" means the Division of Outdoor Recreation.(6)"Executive director" means the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources.(7)"Infrastructure grant" means an outdoor recreational infrastructure grant described in Section 79-8-401.(8)(a)"Recreational infrastructure project" means an undertaking to build or improve an approved facility or installation needed for the public to access and enjoy the state's outdoors.(b)"Recreational infrastructure project" may includeincludes the:(i)establishment, construction, or renovation of a trail, trail infrastructure, or a trail facility;(ii)construction of a project for a water-related outdoor recreational activity;(iii)development of a project for a wildlife watching opportunity, including bird watching;(iv)development of a project that provides a winter recreation amenity;(v)construction or improvement of a community park that has an amenity for outdoor recreation; and(vi)construction or improvement of a naturalistic and accessible playground.; and(vii)construction of a trail or facility, improvement of a trail or facility, or acquisition of equipment that improves access for disabled or adaptive users.(9)"UCORE grant" means a children's outdoor recreation and education grant described in Section 79-8-302.(10)(a)"Underserved community" means a group of people, including a municipality, county, or American Indian tribe, that is economically disadvantaged.(b)"Underserved community" includes an economically disadvantaged community where in relation to awarding a UCORE grant, the children of the community, including children with disabilities, have limited access to outdoor recreation or education programs.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.